languagetool-language-modules/ast/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.aff
FLAG long
SFX Vb order uerdi/Ll order
SFX Vb order ordi/Ll order
SFX Vb order uérdi/XxV1V2 order
SFX Vb order órdi/XxV1V2 order
SFX Vb orrer uerres orrer
SFX Vb orrer uerre/Ll orrer
SFX Vb orrer uerren orrer
SFX Vb orrer uérres/XxV7V8 orrer
SFX Vb orrer uérre/XxV1V2 orrer
SFX Vb orrer uérren/XxV1V2 orrer
SFX Vb orrer uerri/Ll orrer
SFX Vb orrer orri/Ll orrer
SFX Vb orrer uérri/XxV1V2 orrer
SFX Vb orrer órri/XxV1V2 orrer
SFX Vb oser ueses oser
SFX Vb oser ués/V1V2 [se]coser
SFX Vb oser uesen oser
SFX Vb oser uéses/XxV7V8 oser
SFX Vb oser uésen/XxV1V2 oser
SFX Vb oser osi/Ll oser
SFX Vb oser uesi/Ll oser
SFX Vb oser ósi/XxV1V2 oser
SFX Vb oser uési/XxV1V2 oser
SFX Vb over ueves over
SFX Vb over ueve/Ll over
SFX Vb over ueven over
SFX Vb over uéves/XxV7V8 over
SFX Vb over uéve/XxV1V2 over
SFX Vb over uéven/XxV1V2 over
SFX Vb over uevi/Ll over
SFX Vb over ovi/Ll over
SFX Vb over uévi/XxV1V2 over
SFX Vb over óvi/XxV1V2 over
SFX Vb oyer ueyes oyer
SFX Vb oyer ueye/Ll oyer
SFX Vb oyer ueyen oyer
SFX Vb oyer uéyes/XxV7V8 oyer
SFX Vb oyer uéye/XxV1V2 oyer
SFX Vb oyer uéyen/XxV1V2 oyer
SFX Vb oyer ueyi/Ll oyer
SFX Vb oyer oyi/Ll oyer
SFX Vb oyer uéyi/XxV7V8 oyer
SFX Vb oyer óyi/XxV7V8 oyer
SFX Vb enir ienes enir
SFX Vb enir ienen enir
SFX Vb enir iénes/XxV7V8 enir
SFX Vb enir ién/V1V2 [aenor]venir
SFX Vb enir iénen/XxV1V2 enir
SFX Vb enir én/V1V2 [aenor]venir
SFX Vb entir ientes entir
SFX Vb entir iente/Ll entir
SFX Vb entir ienten entir
SFX Vb entir iéntes/XxV7V8 entir
SFX Vb entir iénte/XxV1V2 entir
SFX Vb entir iénten/XxV1V2 entir
SFX Vb entir ienti/Ll entir
SFX Vb entir enti/Ll entir
SFX Vb entir iénti/XxV1V2 entir
SFX Vb entir énti/XxV1V2 entir
SFX Vb erir ieres erir
SFX Vb erir ier/V1 erir
SFX Vb erir ieren erir
SFX Vb erir iéres/XxV7V8 erir
SFX Vb erir iér/XxV2 erir
SFX Vb erir iéren/XxV1V2 erir
SFX Vb ernir iernes ernir
SFX Vb ernir ierne/Ll ernir
SFX Vb ernir iernen ernir
SFX Vb ernir iérnes/XxV7V8 ernir
SFX Vb ernir iérne/XxV1V2 ernir
SFX Vb ernir iérnen/XxV1V2 ernir
SFX Vb ernir ierni/Ll ernir
SFX Vb ernir erni/Ll ernir
SFX Vb ernir iérni/XxV1V2 ernir
SFX Vb ernir érni/XxV1V2 ernir
SFX Vb ertir iertes ertir
SFX Vb ertir ierte/Ll ertir
SFX Vb ertir ierten ertir
SFX Vb ertir iértes/XxV7V8 ertir
SFX Vb ertir iérte/XxV1V2 ertir
SFX Vb ertir iérten/XxV1V2 ertir
SFX Vb ertir ierti/Ll ertir
SFX Vb ertir erti/Ll ertir
SFX Vb ertir iérti/XxV1V2 ertir
SFX Vb ertir érti/XxV1V2 ertir
SFX Vb irir ieres irir
SFX Vb irir ier/V1 irir
SFX Vb irir ieren irir
SFX Vb irir iéres/XxV7V8 irir
SFX Vb irir iér/XxV2 irir
SFX Vb irir iéren/XxV1V2 irir
SFX Vb irir ier/V1 irir
SFX Vb irir iri/Ll irir
SFX Vb irir íri/XxV1V2 irir
SFX Vb ormir uermes ormir
SFX Vb ormir uerme/Ll ormir
SFX Vb ormir uermen ormir
SFX Vb ormir uérmes/XxV7V8 ormir
SFX Vb ormir uérme/XxV1V2 ormir
SFX Vb ormir uérmen/XxV1V2 ormir
SFX Vb ormir uermi/Ll ormir
SFX Vb ormir ormi/Ll ormir
SFX Vb ormir uérmi/XxV1V2 ormir
SFX Vb ormir órmi/XxV1V2 ormir

SFX Vc Y 29
SFX Vc ir imos ir
SFX Vc ir ímos/XxV5V6 ir
SFX Vc ir ís/V9V0 ir
SFX Vc ebir ibes ebir
SFX Vc ebir íbes/XxV7V8 ebir
SFX Vc ebir ibe/Ll ebir
SFX Vc ebir íbe/XxV1V2 ebir
SFX Vc ebir ibi/Ll ebir
SFX Vc ebir íbi/XxV7V8 ebir
SFX Vc ebir iben ebir
SFX Vc ebir íben/XxV1V2 ebir
SFX Vc etir ites etir
SFX Vc etir ítes/XxV7V8 etir
SFX Vc etir ite/Ll etir
SFX Vc etir íte/XxV1V2 etir
SFX Vc etir eti/Ll etir
SFX Vc etir éti/XxV7V8 etir
SFX Vc etir iten etir
SFX Vc etir íten/XxV1V2 etir
SFX Vc exir ixes exir
SFX Vc exir íxes/XxV7V8 exir
SFX Vc exir ixe/Ll exir
SFX Vc exir ixi/Ll exir
SFX Vc exir ix/V1 exir
SFX Vc exir íxe/XxV2 exir
SFX Vc exir íxi/XxV7V8 exir
SFX Vc exir x/XxV2 exir
SFX Vc exir ixen exir
SFX Vc exir íxen/XxV1V2 exir

SFX Vd Y 49
SFX Vd ar amos ar
SFX Vd ar ámos/XxV5V6 ar
SFX Vd ar áis/V9V0 ar
SFX Vd er emos er
SFX Vd er émos/XxV5V6 er
SFX Vd er éis/V9V0 er
SFX Vd ir imos [^o]ir
SFX Vd ir ímos oir
SFX Vd ir ímos/XxV5V6 ir
SFX Vd ir ís/V9V0 ir
SFX Vd ainar aínes/V7V8 ainar
SFX Vd ainar aína/Ll ainar
SFX Vd ainar aínen/V1V2 ainar
SFX Vd aislar aísles/V7V8 aislar
SFX Vd aislar aísla/Ll aislar
SFX Vd aislar aíslen/V1V2 aislar
SFX Vd aizar aíces/V7V8 aizar
SFX Vd aizar aíza/Ll aizar
SFX Vd aizar aícen/V1V2 aizar
SFX Vd auchar aúches/V7V8 auchar
SFX Vd auchar aúcha/Ll auchar
SFX Vd auchar aúchen/V1V2 auchar
SFX Vd aullar aúlles/V7V8 aullar
SFX Vd aullar aúlla/Ll aullar
SFX Vd aullar aúllen/V1V2 aullar
SFX Vd aunar aúnes/V7V8 aunar
SFX Vd aunar aúna/Ll aunar
SFX Vd aunar aúnen/V1V2 aunar
SFX Vd unir únes/V7V8 aunir
SFX Vd unir úne/LlV1V2 aunir
SFX Vd unir únen/V1V2 aunir
SFX Vd unir úni/LlV1V2 aunir
SFX Vd aupar aúpes/V7V8 aupar
SFX Vd aupar aúpa/Ll aupar
SFX Vd aupar aúpen/V1V2 aupar
SFX Vd auñar aúñes/V7V8 auñar
SFX Vd auñar aúña/Ll auñar
SFX Vd auñar aúñen/V1V2 auñar
SFX Vd uir úes/V7V8 lluir
SFX Vd uir úe/V1V2 lluir
SFX Vd uir úen/V1V2 lluir
SFX Vd uir úi/V1V2 lluir
SFX Vd ohibir ohíbes/V7V8 ohibir
SFX Vd ohibir ohíbe/V1V2Ll ohibir
SFX Vd ohibir ohíben/V1V2 ohibir
SFX Vd ohibir ohíbi/V1V2 ohibir
SFX Vd ir is/V7 oir
SFX Vd ir i/V1Ll oir
SFX Vd ir in/V1 oir
